Washington statutes.
RCW 11.76.150

Payment of claims where estate insufficient.

If the estate shall be insufficient to pay the debts of any class, each creditor shall be paid in proportion to his or her claim, and no other creditor of any lower class shall receive any payment until all those of the preceding class shall have been fully paid.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2069; 1965 c 145 s 11.76.150. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 174; RRS s 1544; prior: Code 1881 s 1564; 1854 p 298 s 186.]

NOTES:

Appropriation to pay debts and expenses: Chapter 11.10 RCW.

Community property: Chapter 26.16 RCW.

Descent and distribution of real and personal estate: RCW 11.04.015.

Priority of sale, etc. as between realty and personalty: Chapter 11.10 RCW.